Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions

§
3-8-501.
Application.

This act shall apply to any guardianship and protective proceeding begun on or after the effective date of this act.

Articles 1, 3 and 4 of this act shall apply to any proceeding begun before the effective date of this act, regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been issued.

History.

2013 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§
3-8-502.
Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This act modifies, limits and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001(c) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. section 7003(b).

History.

2013 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.